Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Chapter 55

Industrial Building Bond Act of 1955

7-55-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Industrial Building Bond Act of 1955.”

Acts 1955, ch. 209, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-2901.

Compiler's Notes. Section 3 of Acts 1955, ch. 209, reads as follows:

“That it is hereby determined and declared that the purpose of this act is to do that which the state welfare demands, and the state public policy requires:

“(a) That the migration and loss of the people of Tennessee, who are compelled to leave the territorial limits of the state, daily, weekly, monthly and yearly to obtain employment and earn a livelihood be retarded and reduced.

“(b) That the conditions of unemployment existing statewide in Tennessee be relieved thereby reducing the evils attendant thereto.

“(c) That the average family income in Tennessee be raised and increased as much as possible, but to an amount at least the average over the United States.

“(d) That a means be provided for the citizens of communities to promote and develop industry in their areas, when it is possible for them to do so in their separate and individual capacities.

“(e) That a balanced economic development highly essential to the welfare of this state be promoted.

“(f) That the reconversion from war time and civil defense economy to peace time pursuits be expedited by a program for readjustment of employment to accord with employment problems necessarily arising from changed conditions.

“(g) That the present and prospective health, safety, morals, pursuit of happiness, right to gainful employment and the general welfare of the citizens demand as a public purpose, the development within Tennessee of commercial, industrial, agricultural and manufacturing enterprises by the several municipalities.

“(h) That the means and measures herein authorized to promote such enterprises are, as a matter of public policy, for the public purposes of the several municipalities, and the state of Tennessee.

“(i) That the present and prospective promotion of health, safety, morals, pursuit of happiness, right to gainful employment, and the general welfare of the state requires the measures that are herein and hereby authorized, and to that end will afford ready and attractive markets for farm and garden products, for the development of natural resources, and for the conversion of raw materials of farm, mine and forest into finished products for the general welfare of each of such municipalities, and the entire people of the state.

“(j) That the accomplishment of the things herein authorized to be done by the several municipalities will give to them local benefits peculiar to each, and general benefits to the entire state.”

Cross-References. Industrial Building Revenue Bond Act of 1951, title 7, ch. 37.

Industrial parks, title 13, ch. 16, part 2.

Limitation of actions on bonds, §28-3-113.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal, State and County Aid, § 2.

7-55-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Enterprise” means the industrial operation or operations to be carried on in an industrial building;

“Governing body” includes bodies and boards, by whatsoever names they may be known, charged with the governing of a municipality;

“Industrial building” means any one (1) or combination of two (2) or more buildings, structures, or facilities to be used as a factory, mill, shop, processing plant, assembly plant, fabricating plant, ship canal, port or port facility, dock or dock facility, harbor facility, and railroads, railway terminals, railway belt lines and switches, to be rented or leased to an industrial concern by the municipality; and

“Municipality” includes any county, or incorporated city or town of the state.

Acts 1955, ch. 209, § 2; 1957, ch. 269, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-2902.

7-55-103. Powers of municipality — Restrictions and limitations.

In addition to powers that it may otherwise have in its charter or the laws of this state, any municipality has the power under this chapter, subject to the conditions, limitations and restrictions provided in this chapter, to:

Construct, acquire by gift or purchase, reconstruct, improve, better or extend any industrial building within or without the municipality or partially within or partially without the municipality, but in no event farther than ten (10) miles from the territorial boundaries of such municipality, and acquire by gift or purchase lands or rights in land in connection with the industrial building;

Issue its bonds to finance in whole or in part the cost of the acquisition, purchase, construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment or extension of any industrial buildings, including the acquisition of lands or rights in land in connection with the industrial buildings. The governing body of the municipality in determining such cost may include all costs and estimated cost of the issuance of such bonds, all engineering, inspection, fiscal and legal expenses, and interest that it is estimated will accrue during the construction period and for six (6) months thereafter on money borrowed or that it is estimated will be borrowed pursuant to this chapter;

Rent or lease such industrial buildings to industrial concerns in such manner that rents to be charged for the use of the industrial buildings shall be fixed and revised from time to time, so as to produce income and revenues sufficient to provide for the prompt payment of interest upon all bonds issued under this chapter and create a sinking fund to pay the principal of such bonds when due, and provide for the operation and maintenance of such industrial buildings and for an adequate depreciation account in connection with the industrial buildings;

Pledge to the punctual payment of bonds authorized under this chapter and interest on the bonds the income and revenues to be received from such industrial buildings, including improvements, betterments, or extensions to the buildings thereafter constructed or acquired, sufficient to pay the bonds and interest as they become due and create and maintain reasonable reserves for the bonds and interest;

Further make certain the punctual payment of bonds authorized under this chapter, and interest on the bonds, by pledging the full faith and credit of the municipality under the conditions, restrictions and limitations set forth in this chapter; and

Issue its bonds to refund in whole or in part, bonds theretofore issued by such municipality under authority of this chapter.

Acts 1955, ch. 209, § 4; T.C.A., § 6-2903.

7-55-104. Construction of industrial buildings — Bonds.

The construction, acquisition, reconstruction, improvement, betterment, or extension of any industrial buildings may be authorized under this chapter, and bonds may be authorized to be issued under this chapter to provide funds for such purpose or purposes or for the refunding of bonds theretofore issued under this chapter, by resolution or resolutions of the governing body, which may be adopted at the same meeting at which they are introduced by a majority of all the members of the governing body then in office and shall take effect immediately upon adoption. The bonds shall bear interest at such rate or rates, payable semiannually, may be in one (1) or more series, may bear such date or dates, may mature at such time or times not exceeding forty (40) years from their respective dates, may be payable in such medium of payment at such place or places, may carry such registration privileges, may be subject to such terms of redemption with or without premium, may be executed in such manner, may contain such terms, covenants, and conditions, and may be in such form, either coupon or registered, as such resolution or subsequent resolutions may provide. The bonds may be sold in such manner and upon such terms as may be deemed advisable by the governing body; provided, that bonds for refunding purposes shall not be sold at less than par, but may be delivered in exchange for bonds to be refunded by the refunding bond. Pending the preparation of the definitive bonds, interim receipts or certificates in such form and with such provisions as the governing body may determine may be issued to the purchaser or purchasers of bonds sold pursuant to this chapter. The bonds and interim receipts or certificates shall be fully negotiable within the meaning of and for all purposes of the Uniform Commercial Code, compiled in title 47, chapters 1-9.

Acts 1955, ch. 209, § 5; 1969, ch. 284, § 8; T.C.A., § 6-2904.

7-55-105. Right of municipality to privileges of chapter — Certificate of public purpose and necessity.

The building finance committee in the industrial development division of the department of economic and community development is charged with the duty of making effective the declared public policy of the state and municipalities as set forth in this chapter, and for that purpose is hereby authorized and empowered to determine whether the public welfare demands, and sound state public policy requires, that any municipality shall have the right to engage in any or all of the rights and privileges enumerated in this chapter. Each municipality within this state has the right to apply to the committee for a certificate of public purpose and necessity from the committee as to whether the general welfare requires that such municipality enter into a given enterprise.

In determining whether such certificate shall be issued, the committee may hold public hearings or private hearings, make investigations as may be desired, and shall have power to summon witnesses, administer oaths, hear testimony and make a record of all things had and done at such hearing or investigation, and to order issued such certificate of public purpose and necessity as the committee may deem advisable.

Acts 1955, ch. 209, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 852, § 12; T.C.A., § 6-2905.

Cross-References. Organization of building finance committee, §4-14-109.

7-55-106. Elements necessary before issuance of certificate — Regulation by committee — Consequences of governing body's failure to follow requirements.

The committee shall investigate, find and determine upon application of any municipality for a certificate of public purpose and necessity, as to whether a certificate shall be issued to such municipality to engage in any of the enterprises deemed essential under declared public policy for the economic development and advancement of the municipality, and in considering and determining whether or not such certificate shall issue, the committee shall find and determine affirmatively that:

There are sufficient natural resources readily and economically available for the use and operation of the particular industrial building and enterprise for at least ten (10) years, but in no event less than the period of time for which any bonds may be issued for acquiring or constructing the industrial building;

There is available a labor supply to furnish at least one and one-half (1½) workers for each operative job in the enterprise within an area of twenty-five (25) miles from the proposed location; and

There are adequate property values and suitable financial conditions, so that the total bonded indebtedness of the municipality, solely for the purposes authorized by this chapter, shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the total assessed valuation of all the property in the municipality ascertained by the last completed assessment at the time of the issuance of such bonds.

When the committee shall have determined the facts favorably, it is authorized and empowered, having due regard to the promotion of the public policy and the general welfare, to issue or refuse to issue a certificate of public purpose and necessity to the municipality to engage in providing the industrial building. If and when such certificate is issued, it shall authorize the particular municipality to do all of the things authorized under § 7-54-103, but the certificate shall expire in twelve (12) months from its date, unless within that time such industrial building and enterprise shall have been established, subject, however, to any delays necessitated by any litigation or acts of God, delaying the establishment of the enterprise. In no event shall the committee authorize any municipality actually to provide any such industrial building, unless the committee shall further find and determine that the industrial building and enterprise is well conceived, has a reasonable prospect of success, will provide proper economic development and employment, and will not become a burden upon the taxpayers of the municipality.

If and when the certificate is issued, the committee shall fix and determine in the certificate:

The extent and the amount to which the municipality may issue bonds or make expenditures for such industrial building;

What property may be acquired for the industrial building;

The terms upon which such acquisition may be had;

What expenditures may be made, in the construction of buildings, and of equipment with its installation; and

The method of lease, rental and operation of the industrial building by the municipality.

The committee shall further require as a condition of the certificate that any lessee of such industrial building agree to make payments in lieu of taxes to the municipality in amounts equivalent to the ad valorem property taxes that would have been levied on the industrial building were it owned by the lessee and subject to property taxation. The committee shall also require as a condition of the certificate the use of energy conserving design and construction that includes solar heating systems and solar hot water heaters to the maximum extent feasible economically.

If the governing body of the municipality fails or refuses to follow the requirements made by the committee in the certificate, then the members of the governing body of the municipality voting for such failure or refusal shall be individually and personally liable, and liable on their official bonds for any loss that the municipality may sustain by reason of such failure or refusal to follow the requirements, and in addition may be compelled by injunction to comply with such requirements.

The committee is hereby authorized and empowered to adopt and put into effect all reasonable rules and regulations that it may deem necessary to carry out this chapter, not inconsistent with this chapter.

Acts 1955, ch. 209, § 8; 1975, ch. 311, § 2; T.C.A., § 6-2906; Acts 1980, ch. 532, § 1.

7-55-107. Submission to voters — Election.

The governing body of any municipality desiring to enter into the plan authorized in this chapter, after receiving a certificate of public purpose and necessity from the committee, as provided by this chapter, by resolutions spread upon its minutes, shall declare its intention of entering into such plan, and prior to the delivery and payment for any bonds authorized under this chapter a three-fourths (¾) majority of the registered voters of such municipality voting at an election on the special question of issuing such bonds shall approve of such bond issue; provided, that no such election shall be necessary in connection with the authorization of refunding bonds under this chapter. The governing body shall, by resolution, direct the county election commission to hold an election on the question of issuing the bonds. It shall not be necessary to submit to the voters any question other than the maximum amount of bonds to be issued and the purpose for the bonds. It is the duty of the governing body of such municipality to enter upon its minutes the results and returns of such election, and, after the delivery of any bonds voted upon at such election and payment for the bonds, such entry upon its minutes shall be conclusive evidence of the result of such election, and no suit, action or other proceeding contesting the validity of such election shall be entertained in any of the courts of the state thereafter. If such election results unfavorably to the proposition, then no second or other election shall be ordered or held until the committee shall determine that such election may be held.

Acts 1955, ch. 209, § 9; 1972, ch. 740, § 4(47); T.C.A., § 6-2907.

7-55-108. Bond resolution — Contents and covenants — Receivers — Recourse.

Any resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds under this chapter may contain covenants as to the:

Use and disposition of the rentals from the industrial building for which the bonds are to be issued, including the creation and maintenance of reserves;

Issuance of other or additional bonds payable from the income and revenues from such industrial building;

Maintenance and repair of such industrial building;

Insurance to be carried on the industrial building and the use and disposition of insurance moneys; and

Terms and conditions upon which the holders of the bonds, or any portion of the bonds or any trustees for the bonds, shall be entitled to the appointment of a receiver by the chancery court, which court shall have jurisdiction in such proceedings, and which receiver may enter and take possession of the industrial building and lease and maintain the industrial building, prescribe rentals and collect, receive, and apply all income and revenues thereafter arising from the rentals in the same manner and to the same extent as the municipality itself might do.

This chapter and any such resolution or resolutions shall be a contract with the holder or holders of the bonds and shall continue in effect until the principal of and the interest on the bonds so issued shall have been fully paid, and the duties of the municipality and its governing body and officers under this chapter, and any such resolution or resolutions shall be enforceable by a bondholder by mandamus, or other appropriate suit, action or proceedings in any court of competent jurisdiction.

Acts 1955, ch. 209, § 10; T.C.A., § 6-2908.

7-55-109. Validity in bond issues — Recital.

Bonds bearing the signatures of officers in office on the date of the signing of the bonds shall be valid and binding obligations, notwithstanding that before the delivery of the bonds and payment for the bonds, any or all the persons whose signatures appear on the bonds shall have ceased to be officers of the municipality issuing the bonds. The validity of the bonds shall not be dependent on nor affected by the validity or regularity of any proceedings relating to the acquisition, purchase, construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment, or extension of the industrial building for which the bonds are issued. The resolution authorizing the bonds may provide that the bonds shall contain a recital that they are issued pursuant to this chapter, which recital shall be conclusive evidence of their validity and of the regularity of their issuance.

Acts 1955, ch. 209, § 11; T.C.A., § 6-2909.

7-55-110. Lien on rentals.

All bonds issued under this chapter shall have a lien upon the rentals from the industrial building for which the bonds have been issued, and the governing body may provide in the resolution or resolutions authorizing such bonds for the issuance of additional bonds to be equally and ratably secured by a lien upon such rentals or may provide that the lien upon such rentals for future bonds shall be subordinate.

Acts 1955, ch. 209, § 12; T.C.A., § 6-2910.

7-55-111. Securing bonds — Enforcement by bondholders — Tax levy — Restrictions.

In order to secure the payment of any of the bonds issued pursuant to this chapter, and interest on the bonds, or in connection with such bonds, any municipality has the power as to such bonds to pledge, in addition to all other revenues and funds provided for in this chapter, the full faith and credit and unlimited taxing power of the municipality to the punctual payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds, subject to this chapter. In the event such pledge of full faith and credit and unlimited taxing power of the municipality is given, any holder or holders of the bonds, including a trustee or trustees for holders of such bonds, shall have the right, in addition to all other rights, by mandamus or other suit, action or proceedings in any court of competent jurisdiction to enforce such holder's or holders' rights against the municipality, and the governing body of the municipality, and any officer, agent or employee of the municipality, including, but not limited to, the right to require the municipality and governing body and any proper officer, agent or employee of the municipality, to assess, levy and collect taxes and other revenues and charges adequate to carry out any agreement as to, or pledge of, such taxes, revenues and charges. The taxes authorized to be pledged in this section shall be levied without limit as to rate or amount upon all taxable property within the municipality, and all such taxes to be levied are hereby declared to have been levied for county and corporation purposes, respectively, within the meaning of Constitution of Tennessee, Article II, § 29.

Acts 1955, ch. 209, § 13; T.C.A., § 6-2911.

7-55-112. Collection and revision of rent — Separation of funds.

The governing body of a municipality issuing bonds pursuant to this chapter shall prescribe and collect rentals for industrial buildings and shall revise such rentals from time to time whenever necessary so that the income and revenues to be derived from such rentals will always be sufficient to pay when due all bonds and interest on the bonds for the payment of which such revenues are pledged, including reserves for the payment of the bonds and interest, and to provide for all expenses of operation, maintenance, and depreciation charges of such industrial buildings. All funds arising under this chapter shall be kept separately and apart from other funds of the county, city or town, as the case may be.

Acts 1955, ch. 209, § 14; T.C.A., § 6-2912.

7-55-113. Exemption from taxation.

All bonds issued pursuant to this chapter and the income from the bonds shall be exempt from all state, county and municipal taxation, except inheritance, transfer and estate taxes.

Acts 1955, ch. 209, § 15; T.C.A., § 6-2913.

7-55-114. Bonds as investments.

Bonds issued under the authority of this chapter and secured by a pledge of full faith and credit shall be and are hereby declared to be legal and authorized investments for banks, savings banks, trust companies, building and loan associations, insurance companies, fiduciaries, trustees, guardians and for all public funds of the state, including, but not limited to, the sinking funds of cities, towns, villages, counties, school districts, or other political corporations or subdivisions of the state. Such bonds shall be eligible to secure the deposit of any and all public funds of the state and any and all public funds of cities, towns, villages, counties, school districts or other political corporations or subdivisions of the state, and such bonds shall be lawful and sufficient security for such deposits to the extent of their value when accompanied by all unmatured coupons appertaining thereto.

Acts 1955, ch. 209, § 16; T.C.A., § 6-2914.

7-55-115. Joint exercise of powers.

Counties and municipalities may exercise jointly the powers and authorities conferred upon them in this chapter individually.

Acts 1955, ch. 209, § 17; T.C.A., § 6-2915.

7-55-116. Powers supplemental.

The powers conferred by this chapter shall be in addition and supplemental to, and the limitations imposed by this chapter shall not affect the powers conferred by any other general, special or local law. Industrial buildings may be acquired, purchased, constructed, reconstructed, improved, bettered, and extended, and bonds may be issued under this chapter for such purposes, notwithstanding that any general, special, or local law may provide for the acquisition, purchase, construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment and extension of a like industrial building, or the issuance of bonds for like purposes, and without regard to the requirement, restrictions, limitations or other provisions contained in any other general, special or local law.

Acts 1955, ch. 209, § 18; T.C.A., § 6-2916.